Georgia, session 2025_26, HB351.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
9 SECTION 1.
10 Part 1 of Article 2 of Chapter 8 of Title 12 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
11 relating to general provisions regarding solid waste management, is amended by revising
12 paragraphs (16) and (37) of Code Section 12-8-22, relating to definitions, as follows:
13 "(16) 'Manifest' means a form or document used for identifying the quantity and
14 composition and the origin, routing, and destination of special solid waste during its
15 transportation from the point of generation, through any intermediate points, to the point
16 of disposal, treatment, or storage."
H. B. 351
- 1 -

25 LC 44 2891
17 "(37) 'Special solid waste' means any solid waste not otherwise regulated under Part 1
18 of Article 3 of this chapter, known as the 'Georgia Hazardous Waste Management Act,'
19 and regulations promulgated under such part originating or produced from or by a source
20 or generator not subject to regulation under Code Section 12-8-24 Reserved."
21 SECTION 2.
22 Said part is further amended by revising Code Section 12-8-23, relating to powers and duties
23 of board, as follows:
24 "12-8-23.
25 In the performance of its duties the board shall have and may exercise the power to:
26 (1) Adopt, promulgate, modify, amend, and repeal rules and regulations to implement
27 and enforce the provisions of this part as the board may deem necessary to provide for
28 the control and management of solid waste to protect the environment and the health of
29 humans. Such rules and regulations may be applicable to the state as a whole or may
30 vary from area to area or may vary by waste characteristics, as may be appropriate to
31 facilitate the accomplishment of the provisions, purposes, and policies of this part. The
32 rules and regulations may include, but shall not be limited to, the following:
33 (A) Rules and regulations governing and controlling solid waste handling, including
34 measures to ensure that solid waste management practices are regulated, governed, and
35 controlled in the public interest;
36 (B) Rules and regulations prescribing the procedure to be followed in applying for
37 permits and requiring the submission of such plans, specifications, verifications, and
38 other pertinent information deemed relevant in connection with the issuance of such
39 permits;
40 (C) Rules and regulations concerning the establishment of permits by rule;
41 (D) Rules and regulations establishing the use of a manifest during the generation and
42 handling of special solid waste Reserved;
H. B. 351
- 2 -

25 LC 44 2891
43 (E) Rules and regulations governing and controlling the handling of special solid waste
44 and biomedical waste;
45 (F) Rules and regulations establishing criteria and a system of priorities for the
46 distribution of any state funds as may be made available through a grant-in-aid program
47 to assist financially local governmental agencies or authorities in the planning,
48 implementing, maintaining, or operating of solid waste handling systems which are
49 consistent with local and regional solid waste management plans;
50 (G) Rules and regulations establishing procedures and requirements for the postclosure
51 care of all solid waste disposal facilities, including but not limited to corrective action
52 of releases, ground-water monitoring, and maintenance of final cover;
53 (H) Rules and regulations establishing the criteria for approval, time periods for
54 coverage, and other terms and conditions for the demonstration of financial
55 responsibility required by this part and for the implementation of financial
56 responsibility instruments;
57 (I) Rules and regulations establishing qualifications for municipal solid waste disposal
58 facility operators and certification of such operators through colleges or universities of
59 the University System of Georgia or other organizations as may be determined
60 acceptable by the board;
61 (J) Rules and regulations regulating the generation, collection, processing, and disposal
62 of scrap tires and the collection, inventory, and marketing of used tires and governing
63 the investigation and cleanup of sites where scrap tires have been disposed regardless
64 of the date when such disposal occurred; and
65 (K) Rules and regulations further defining what shall or shall not constitute 'recovered
66 materials'; and
67 (2) Take all necessary steps to ensure the effective enforcement of this part."
H. B. 351
- 3 -

25 LC 44 2891
68 SECTION 3.
69 Said part is further amended in Code Section 12-8-24, relating to permits for solid waste or
70 special solid waste handling, disposal, or thermal treatment technology facility and
71 inspection of solid waste generators, by revising subsections (a), (c), and (d), paragraph (2)
72 of subsection (e), and subsections (g) and (h) as follows:
73 "(a) No person shall engage in solid waste or special solid waste handling in Georgia or
74 construct or operate a solid waste handling facility in Georgia, except those individuals
75 exempted from this part under Code Section 12-8-30.10, without first obtaining a permit
76 from the director authorizing such activity."
77 "(c) On or after March 30, 1990, any permit for the transportation of municipal solid waste
78 from a jurisdiction generating solid waste to a municipal solid waste disposal facility
79 located in another county shall be conditioned upon the jurisdiction generating solid waste
80 developing and being actively involved in, by July 1, 1992, a strategy for meeting the
81 state-wide goal of waste reduction by July 1, 1996 Reserved.
82 (d) If the director determines that such activity will result in any violation of this part or
83 any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to this part, he the director shall deny the
84 permit; otherwise, he the director shall issue the permit, specifying on the permit the
85 conditions under which such activity shall be conducted; provided, however, that a public
86 hearing shall be held by the governing authority of the county or municipality in which the
87 municipal solid waste or special solid waste handling shall occur not less than two weeks
88 prior to the issuance of any permit under this Code section and notice of such hearing shall
89 be posted at the proposed site and advertised in a newspaper of general circulation serving
90 the county or counties in which the proposed activity will be conducted at least 30 days
91 prior to such hearing."
92 "(2) Prior to the granting of any major modification of an existing solid waste handling
93 permit by the director, a public hearing shall be held by the governing authority of the
94 county or municipality in which the municipal solid waste facility or special solid waste
H. B. 351
- 4 -

25 LC 44 2891
95 handling facility requesting the modification is located not less than two weeks prior to
96 the issuance of any permit under this Code section and notice of such hearing shall be
97 posted at the site of such facility and advertised in a newspaper of general circulation
98 serving the county or counties in which such facility is located at least 30 days prior to
99 such hearing."
100 "(g)(1) Prior to the issuance of The director shall require that an applicant for any permit
101 for a solid waste handling facility or the granting of any major modification of an existing
102 solid waste handling permit, the director shall require written verification to be furnished
103 by the applicant submit to the division written verification from an authorized official of
104 the host local government for the facility or proposed facility or major modification that
105 is no more than 36 months old from the date of application that:
106 (A) Identifies the type of facility or proposed facility;
107 (B) Describes the location of such facility or proposed facility by tax parcel
108 identification number or legal description;
109 (C) Expressly states that the facility or proposed facility complies with local zoning or
110 land use ordinances, if any or that there are no such local zoning or land use ordinances;
111 and after July 1, 1992,
112 (D) States that the facility or proposed facility is consistent with the local,
113 multijurisdictional, or regional solid waste management plan developed and adopted
114 by the host local government in accordance with standards promulgated pursuant to this
115 part subject to the provisions of Code Section 12-8-31.1 and that the host jurisdiction
116 and all jurisdictions generating solid waste destined for the applicants' facility can
117 demonstrate that they are part of an approved solid waste plan developed in accordance
118 with standards promulgated pursuant to this part and are actively involved in and have
119 a strategy for meeting the state-wide goal of waste reduction by July 1, 1996. Prior to
120 the issuance of any permit for a solid waste handling facility or the granting of any
121 major modification of an existing solid waste handling permit that will handle solid
H. B. 351
- 5 -

25 LC 44 2891
122 waste from jurisdictions outside Georgia, the out-of-state solid waste generating
123 jurisdictions shall provide documentation that they have a strategy for and are actively
124 involved in meeting planning requirements and a waste reduction goal that are
125 substantially equivalent to the planning requirements and waste reduction goal
126 contained in this part; and
127 (E) Attaches or cross-references the ordinance or resolution which specifically
128 authorizes an administrative official or employee of the host local government to
129 provide the written verification required by subparagraphs (C) and (D) of this
130 paragraph, if applicable.
131 (2) For purposes of paragraph (1) of this subsection, written verification may be executed
132 by an administrative official or employee of the host local government only if that person
133 has been authorized to provide the written verification by ordinance or resolution of the
134 governing authority. In the absence of such authorization, written verification shall be
135 executed by the chief elected official of the governing authority of the host local
136 government.
137 (3) If, after reviewing all application materials and approving the final design and
138 operation plan for a facility or proposed facility or major modification, the director, in his
139 or her sole discretion, determines that such facility or proposed facility or major
140 modification is substantially different from that described in the application, before
141 issuing the permit the director may request in writing that the applicant submit to the
142 division written verification from the governing authority of the host local government
143 for the facility or proposed facility reconfirming that, as described in the final design and
144 operation plan, the facility or proposed facility or major modification complies with local
145 zoning or land use ordinances, if any, in effect at the time of application submission and
146 is consistent with the local, multijurisdictional, or regional solid waste management plan
147 developed and adopted by the host local government in effect at the time of application
148 submission.
H. B. 351
- 6 -

25 LC 44 2891
149 (4) Such written verification from the host local government shall constitute a
150 determination that the facility or proposed facility or major modification is consistent
151 with the applicable requirements of subsection (e) of Code Section 12-8-31.1.
152 (h) No permit for a disposal facility shall be issued to any regional solid waste
153 management authority created under Part 2 of this article, the 'Regional Solid Waste
154 Management Authorities Act,' until local and regional solid waste management plans
155 consistent with this part have been developed for all jurisdictions participating in such
156 authority and such plans are found to be consistent with the state solid waste management
157 plan pursuant to described in subsection (d) (c) of Code Section 12-8-31.1 12-8-31."
158 SECTION 4.
159 Said part is further amended in Code Section 12-8-25.3, relating to further restrictions on
160 sites within significant ground-water recharge area or near military air space used as
161 bombing range, by revising subsections (a) and (b) as follows:
162 (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 12-8-25.2, no permit shall be issued
163 for a municipal solid waste landfill which accepts solid waste generated from outside the
164 county in which such landfill is located or, in the case of a regional landfill, from outside
165 any of the counties or special districts empowered to engage in solid waste management
166 activities constituting such region if any part of such site is within any area that has been
167 designated by the director as a significant ground-water recharge area Reserved.
168 (b) In addition to the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section, in the case of a
169 regional municipal solid waste landfill where any part of such site is within any area that
170 has been designated by the director as a significant ground-water recharge area, no permit
171 shall be issued for such regional landfill unless the boundaries of the counties or special
172 districts empowered to engage in solid waste management activities are contiguous and
173 such counties or special districts have entered into a joint contract for the collection and
174 disposal of solid waste Reserved."
H. B. 351
- 7 -

25 LC 44 2891
175 SECTION 5.
176 Said part is further amended by revising Code Section 12-8-26, relating to public meetings
177 on site selection, notice, and decision, as follows:
178 "12-8-26.
179 (a) Any county, municipality, group of counties, or government authority beginning a
180 process to select a site for on which such county, municipality, group of counties, or
181 government authority intends to own or operate a municipal solid waste disposal facility
182 must first call at least one public meeting to discuss waste management needs of the local
183 government or region and to describe the process of siting facilities to the public. Notice
184 of this meeting shall be published within a newspaper of general circulation serving such
185 county or municipality at least once a week for two weeks 14 days and again at least seven
186 days immediately preceding the date of such meeting. A regional solid waste management
187 authority created under Part 2 of this article must hold at least one meeting within each
188 jurisdiction participating in such authority, and notice for these meetings must be published
189 within a newspaper of general circulation serving each such jurisdiction at least once a
190 week for two weeks 14 days and again at least seven days immediately preceding the date
191 of such meeting.
192 (b) The governing authority of any county or municipality taking action resulting in a
193 publicly or privately owned municipal solid waste disposal facility siting decision shall
194 cause to be published within a newspaper of general circulation serving such county or
195 municipality a notice of the meeting at which such siting decision is to be made at least
196 once a week for two weeks immediately preceding the date of such meeting. Such notice
197 shall state the time, place, and purpose of the meeting and the meeting shall be conducted
198 by the governing authority taking the action. A siting decision shall include, but is not
199 limited to, such activities as the final selection of property for landfilling and the execution
200 of contracts or agreements pertaining to the location of municipal solid waste disposal
201 facilities within the jurisdiction, but shall not include zoning decisions Before a host local
H. B. 351
- 8 -

25 LC 44 2891
202 government verifies in writing that a proposed new public or private municipal solid waste
203 disposal facility or a major modification expanding the permit boundaries of an existing
204 facility is consistent with the local, multijurisdictional, or regional solid waste management
205 plan adopted by the host local government and local zoning or land use ordinances, as
206 required by subsection (g) of Code Section 12-8-24, the governing authority of the host
207 local government shall comply with the notice and meeting requirements set forth in this
208 part. Prior to issuing written verification, such governing authority shall cause a notice of
209 the meeting at which the public will be informed of the proposed new facility or major
210 modification expanding the permit boundaries of an existing facility to be published in a
211 newspaper of general circulation serving such local government. The meeting notice shall
212 be published at least 14 days and again at least seven days preceding the date of such
213 meeting. The meeting notice shall identify the governing authority of the host local
214 government jurisdiction that will conduct the meeting and shall include the time, place, and
215 purpose of the meeting. During the meeting on the proposed new facility or major
216 modification expanding the permit boundaries of an existing facility, the governing
217 authority of the host local government shall inform the public of:
218 (1) The location of the proposed new facility or major modification expanding the permit
219 boundaries of an existing facility;
220 (2) The type of facility and operations proposed; and
221 (3) The process by which such governing authority shall provide the written verification
222 described in subsection (g) of Code Section 12-8-24."
223 SECTION 6.
224 Said part is further amended in Code Section 12-8-27.1, relating to Solid Waste Trust Fund,
225 by revising paragraph (1) of subsection (e) as follows:
226 "(e)(1) If the director determines that a solid waste or special solid waste handling facility
227 has been abandoned, that the owner or operator thereof has become insolvent, or that for
H. B. 351
- 9 -

25 LC 44 2891
228 any other reason there is a demonstrated unwillingness or inability of the owner or
229 operator to maintain, operate, or close the facility, to carry out postclosure care of the
230 facility, or to carry out corrective action required as a condition of a permit to the
231 satisfaction of the director, the director may implement the applicable financial
232 responsibility mechanisms. The proceeds from any applicable financial responsibility
233 mechanisms shall be deposited into the Solid Waste Trust fund."
234 SECTION 7.
235 Said part is further amended in Code Section 12-8-31.1, relating to local, multijurisdictional,
236 or regional solid waste plans, reporting by cities and counties, and annual reporting
237 requirements for landfill owners and operators, by revising subsections (a) and (d) through
238 (h) as follows:
239 "(a)(1) Each city and county in Georgia shall develop or be included in a comprehensive
240 solid waste management plan. Said plan may be developed independently as a local plan
241 or jointly with other jurisdictions as a multijurisdictional or regional solid waste plan.
242 (2)(A) The Department of Community Affairs under the provisions of Chapter 13 of
243 Title 50 shall promulgate solid waste planning guidance that a city or county may use
244 to update or amend such city's or county's solid waste plan.
245 (B) Any city or county that proposes to update or amend its solid waste management
246 plan shall publish notice of such proposed action in the county legal organ or the city's
247 or county's Internet website, as applicable, at least two weeks prior to adopting such
248 update or amendment to its plan in accordance with subsection (c) of this Code section."
249 "(d) Each city and county may report annually to the Department of Community Affairs
250 division on the status of solid waste management in the jurisdiction or may post such
251 reports on its website. Such reports may be individual or collective in nature or, in lieu of
252 local reports, a regional report may be filed by any of the several regional commissions for
H. B. 351
- 10 -

25 LC 44 2891
253 political jurisdictions within their region. The annual report may include but not be limited
254 to:
255 (1) The amount of solid waste collected, processed, and disposed of in the area;
256 (2) The progress on the reduction in solid waste, as evidenced by the solid waste
257 received at disposal facilities in the planning area since the previous reporting period and
258 total cumulative progress made toward meeting the waste reduction goals of the state;
259 (3) The remaining permitted capacity of disposal facilities;
260 (4) Recycling and composting activities in existence;
261 (5) Public information and education activities during the reporting period; and
262 (6) Any other pertinent information as may be required.
263 (e) After July 1, 1992, no permit, grant, or loan shall be issued for any municipal solid
264 waste disposal facility or any solid waste handling equipment or recycling equipment
265 used in conjunction therewith in a county or region which is not consistent with a local,
266 multijurisdictional, or regional solid waste management plan. Each application for a
267 permit, major modification, grant, or loan issued after July 1, 1992, shall include the
268 following:
269 (1) Certification that the facility for which a permit or major modification is sought
270 complies with local land use and or zoning requirements, if any;
271 (2) Verification that the facility for which a permit, major modification, grant, or loan
272 is sought meets the ten-year capacity needs identified in the is consistent with the
273 applicable local, multijurisdictional, or regional solid waste management plan; and
274 (3) Demonstration that the host jurisdiction and all jurisdictions generating solid waste
275 destined for the applicant's facility are part of an approved local government has adopted
276 a solid waste management plan or updated plan developed consistent with standards
277 promulgated pursuant to this part, and are actively involved in, and have a strategy for,
278 meeting the state-wide goal for reduction of solid waste disposal in accordance with the
279 requirements of subsection (c) of this Code section.
H. B. 351
- 11 -

25 LC 44 2891
280 (f) This Code section shall not apply to:
281 (1) Any any solid waste disposal facility which is operated exclusively by a private solid
282 waste generator on property owned by the private solid waste generator for the purpose
283 of accepting solid waste exclusively from the private solid waste generator so long as the
284 operation of the solid waste disposal facility does not adversely affect the public health
285 or the environment. After commencement of operation by a private solid waste generator
286 of a solid waste disposal facility which is permitted but not included in a local or regional
287 solid waste management plan, an amendment into a local or regional solid waste
288 management plan shall be required for any solid waste which is to be no longer disposed
289 of by the private solid waste generator in its own solid waste disposal facility prior to any
290 substantial reduction in the amount of solid waste accepted by the solid waste disposal
291 facility or its closure; or.
292 (2) Any privately owned solid waste handling facility seeking a permit or major
293 modification of an existing permit where the host local governing authority has failed to
294 make a good faith effort, as determined by the Department of Community Affairs, to
295 develop and adopt a local solid waste management plan or to be included in a
296 multijurisdictional or regional solid waste management plan; provided, however, that the
297 permit applicant continues to be obligated to demonstrate that all generating jurisdictions
298 from which waste will be received are part of an approved solid waste management plan
299 developed in accordance with planning guidance promulgated pursuant to this part and
300 have a strategy to meet and are actively engaged in meeting the state-wide goal of
301 reducing waste.
302 (g) Effective July 1, 1991, it It shall be the responsibility of the owner or operator of each
303 municipal solid waste disposal facility to keep an accurate written record of all amounts of
304 solid waste measured in tons received at the facility. Measurement in tons of solid waste
305 received shall be accomplished by one or more of the following methods:
H. B. 351
- 12 -

25 LC 44 2891
306 (1) The provision of stationary or portable scales at the disposal facility for weighing
307 incoming waste;
308 (2) Implementation of contractual or other arrangements for the use of scales at a
309 location other than the disposal facility for weighing all waste destined for disposal at the
310 facility; or
311 (3) Implementation of contractual or other arrangements for the use of scales at a
312 location other than the disposal facility to weigh representative samples of the solid waste
313 received at the disposal facility on a basis which is sufficiently frequent to estimate
314 accurately the amount of solid waste received at the disposal facility.
315 (h) The provisions of subsection (d) of this Code section notwithstanding, each public or
316 private owner or operator of a municipal solid waste landfill shall report annually to the
317 Department of Community Affairs division on the status of solid waste management for
318 each municipal solid waste landfill it owns or operates in this state. The annual report for
319 each such landfill shall include but not be limited to:
320 (1) The amount of solid waste collected, processed, and disposed of at such landfill;
321 (2) The remaining permitted capacity of the landfill;
322 (3) Recycling and composting activities in existence Quantities of material recycled and
323 composted annually at such landfill; and
324 (4) Any other pertinent information as may be required by the Department of
325 Community Affairs division."
326 SECTION 8.
327 Said part is further amended in Code Section 12-8-39, relating to cost reimbursement fees,
328 surcharges, exempt contracts, and reporting, by revising subsection (c) as follows:
329 "(c) Effective January 1, 1992, when a municipal solid waste disposal facility is operated
330 as a joint venture by more than one city or county or combination thereof, by a special solid
331 waste district, or by an authority, the cost reimbursement fee specified in this Code section
H. B. 351
- 13 -

25 LC 44 2891
332 shall be imposed by the joint operators, district, or authority and the cost reimbursement
333 fee received shall be administered as outlined in subsection (b) of this Code section and
334 shall be remitted into a restricted account established by the participating local
335 governments."
336 SECTION 9.
337 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 351
- 14 -